Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.045

Conditions of release—Drugs and intoxicating liquors—Testing.

A judicial officer in a municipal, district, or superior court imposing conditions of pretrial release for a defendant accused of a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony offense, may prohibit the defendant from possessing or consuming any intoxicating liquors or drugs not prescribed to the defendant, and require the defendant to submit to testing to determine the defendant's compliance with this condition, when the judicial officer determines that such condition is necessary to protect the public from harm.

[ 2018 c 276 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2018 c 276: See note following RCW 10.21.015.